Mississippi, session 2026, HB48.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Grocery Initiative Act". SECTION 2. (1)  For the purposes of this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a) "Department" means the Department of Human Services. (b)  "Food desert" means locations where the residential population lacks adequate access to affordable nutritious foods, typically lower-income areas where there is no access to a grocery store within at least one-half (1/2) mile in urban areas or at least ten (10) miles in nonurban areas. (c)  "Food resource" means any source that provides or enables access, availability, or affordability of healthy food products including food retailers, food banks, food pantries, specialty grocers, supermarkets, corner stores, restaurants, state benefits offices, food box voucher programs, or other mechanisms that enable healthy food access in food desert communities. (d)  "Local governmental unit" means any county, municipality, special district, or unit that is designated as a unit of local government by law and exercises limited governmental powers or powers in respect to limited governmental subjects.  The term "local governmental unit" also includes any school district or community college district. (e) "Nonprofit" means an organization or institution that is organized as a nonprofit corporation according to the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Law. (f)  "Specialty grocer" means a food resource that provides or enables the access, availability, or affordability of culturally diverse food products, including independent retail operations. (2)  The department shall, subject to appropriation, establish a program known as the Mississippi Grocery Initiative to expand access to healthy foods in food deserts in Mississippi and areas at risk of becoming food deserts in Mississippi by providing grants and other forms of financial assistance to an eligible food resource, nonprofit food resource, local governmental unit food resource, or specialty grocer.  The department may: (a)  Enter into contracts, grants, or other agreements to administer the program; (b)  Place limits on the size of the food resources that are eligible for grants and other financial assistance under the program; (c)  Award grants and other financial assistance to eligible food resources, nonprofit food resources, local governmental unit food resources, or specialty grocers based on poverty rates, income, geographic diversity, local ownership, access to food resources in the area surrounding proposed project locations, and other factors as determined by the department; and (d)  Award grants and other financial assistance for any one (1) or more of the following:  equipment, capital expenses, operational expenses, administrative expenses, supplies or other costs as determined by the department. (3)  The department shall share information and make available technical assistance and counseling to Mississippi Grocery Initiative participants.  The department may provide counseling to the participants and assist participants to navigate regulatory processes, streamline compliance requirements, and access capital and other funding opportunities. (4)  The department shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the Mississippi Grocery Initiative, and the department shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this section. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.